West Virginia, session 2026, HB5169.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. personal income tax. §11-21-26a. Tax deduction for individuals claiming a federal "Trump Account" for newborns. (a) All persons claiming a federal "Trump Account," as provided in federal code 26 USC 530A, are eligible to receive a tax deduction as set forth in subsection (c).(b) Parents shall only be eligible if their children are eligible for the "Trump Account." (c) Any payment made by parents utilizing the "Trump Account" on behalf of their children shall be eligible for a state tax deduction, as similarly provided for college savings plans ("Smart 529" plans or "529 plans") in §18-30-9 of this code.